Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.160

Relief by injunction—Director and board immunity.

The director is authorized to apply for relief by injunction without bond, to restrain a person from the commission of any act that is prohibited under RCW 18.280.140. In such a proceeding, it is not necessary to allege or prove either that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from continued violation. The director, individuals acting on the director's behalf, and members of the board are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties in the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

[ 2008 c 119 s 16.]